Illinois, session 104th, SB1865.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Campus 5Free Speech Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative findings. The General Assembly 7finds the following:8        (1) Section 4 of Article I of the Illinois 9    Constitution recognizes that "all persons may speak, write 10    and publish freely, being responsible for the abuse of 11    that liberty. In trials for libel, both civil and 12    criminal, the truth, when published with good motives and 13    for justifiable ends, shall be a sufficient defense".14        (2) Public institutions of higher education have 15    historically embraced a commitment to freedom of 16    expression in policy.17        (3) In recent years, some public institutions of 18    higher education have abdicated their responsibility to 19    uphold free-speech principles, and these failures make it 20    appropriate for all public institutions of higher 21    education to restate and confirm their commitment in this 22    regard.23        (4) In 1974, the Committee on Free Expression at Yale   SB1865- 2 -LRB104 08881 LNS 18936 b1    University issued a statement known as the Woodward Report 2    that stands as a classic defense of free expression on 3    campuses; in 2015, the Committee on Freedom of Expression 4    at the University of Chicago issued a similar and widely 5    respected report; and in 1967, the Kalven Committee Report 6    of the University of Chicago articulated the principle of 7    institutional neutrality regarding political and social 8    issues and the essential role of such neutrality in 9    protecting freedom of thought and expression at 10    universities. The principles affirmed by these 3 highly 11    regarded reports are inspiring articulations of the 12    critical importance of free expression in higher 13    education.14        (5) The General Assembly views freedom of expression 15    as being of critical importance and requires that each 16    public institution of higher education ensure free, 17    robust, and uninhibited debate and deliberation by 18    students of public institutions whether on or off campus.19        (6) The General Assembly has determined that it is a 20    matter of statewide concern that all public institutions 21    of higher education officially recognize freedom of speech 22    as a fundamental right. 23    Section 10. Definition. In this Act, "public institution" 24means a public university or public community college in this 25State.   SB1865- 3 -LRB104 08881 LNS 18936 b1    Section 15. Policy on free expression required. The board 2of trustees of a public institution shall develop and adopt a 3policy on free expression that contains, at least, the 4following:5        (1) A statement that the primary function of an 6    institution of higher education is the discovery, 7    improvement, transmission, and dissemination of knowledge 8    by means of research, teaching, discussion, and debate. 9    This statement shall provide that, to fulfill this 10    function, the institution must strive to ensure the 11    fullest degree of intellectual freedom and free 12    expression.13        (2) A statement that it is not the proper role of the 14    institution to shield individuals from speech protected by 15    the First Amendment, including, without limitation, ideas 16    and opinions they find unwelcome, disagreeable, or even 17    deeply offensive.18        (3) A statement that students and faculty have the 19    freedom to discuss any problem that presents itself, as 20    the First Amendment permits and within the limits of 21    reasonable viewpoint and content-neutral restrictions on 22    time, place, and manner of expression that are consistent 23    with this Act and that are necessary to achieve a 24    significant institutional interest; provided that these 25    restrictions are clear, are published, and provide ample   SB1865- 4 -LRB104 08881 LNS 18936 b1    alternative means of expression. Students and faculty 2    shall be permitted to assemble and engage in spontaneous 3    expressive activity as long as the activity is not 4    unlawful and does not materially and substantially disrupt 5    the functioning of the institution, subject to the 6    requirements of this Act.7        (4) A statement that the campuses of the institution 8    are open to speakers invited by students, student groups, 9    or members of the faculty without regard to viewpoint or 10    content of the proposed speech. If a fee applies to a 11    speech by an invited speaker, the inviting students, 12    student groups, or members of the faculty may not be 13    charged greater or lesser amounts based on the viewpoint, 14    content, or expected reaction to the speech.15        (5) A statement that the outdoor public areas of 16    campuses of the institution are designated public forums, 17    open on the same terms to any speaker, and that any person 18    lawfully present on campus may leaflet, protest, or 19    demonstrate in those outdoor public areas.20        (6) A provision setting forth the affirmative steps 21    that the institution will take to protect the free-speech 22    rights of invited speakers.23        (7) A provision that, in all disciplinary cases 24    involving expressive conduct, students are entitled to a 25    disciplinary hearing under published procedures. When 26    suspension for longer than 30 days or expulsion are   SB1865- 5 -LRB104 08881 LNS 18936 b1    potential penalties, students are entitled to the right to 2    active assistance of counsel.3        (8) A statement that the institution may not take 4    action, as an institution, on the public policy 5    controversies of the day in such a way as to require 6    students or faculty to publicly espouse any given 7    viewpoint, provided that the institution may prescribe the 8    content of its curriculum.9        (9) A statement that this policy supersedes and 10    nullifies any prior provisions in the policies and 11    regulations of the institution that restrict speech on 12    campus and are, therefore, inconsistent with this policy 13    on free expression. The institution shall remove or revise 14    any such provisions in its policies and regulations to 15    ensure compatibility with this policy on free expression. 16    Section 20. Committee on Free Expression.17    (a) The Board of Higher Education shall create a single 18Committee on Free Expression consisting of all of the 19following members, all of whom shall serve without 20compensation:21        (1) One member representing the University of Illinois 22    at Urbana-Champaign, appointed by the university's board 23    of trustees.24        (2) One member representing the University of Illinois 25    at Springfield, appointed by the university's board of   SB1865- 6 -LRB104 08881 LNS 18936 b1    trustees.2        (3) One member representing the University of Illinois 3    at Chicago, appointed by the university's board of 4    trustees.5        (4) One member representing Southern Illinois 6    University at Carbondale, appointed by the university's 7    board of trustees.8        (5) One member representing Southern Illinois 9    University at Edwardsville, appointed by the university's 10    board of trustees.11        (6) One member representing Western Illinois 12    University, appointed by the university's board of 13    trustees.14        (7) One member representing Eastern Illinois 15    University, appointed by the university's board of 16    trustees.17        (8) One member representing Illinois State University, 18    appointed by the university's board of trustees.19        (9) One member representing Northern Illinois 20    University, appointed by the university's board of 21    trustees.22        (10) One member representing Chicago State University, 23    appointed by the university's board of trustees.24        (11) One member representing Governors State 25    University, appointed by the university's board of 26    trustees.  SB1865- 7 -LRB104 08881 LNS 18936 b1        (12) One member representing Northeastern Illinois 2    University, appointed by the university's board of 3    trustees.4        (13) Three members representing public community 5    colleges, appointed by the Illinois Community College 6    Board at its discretion.7        (14) Four members representing faculty members, 2 8    appointed by the Board of Higher Education and 2 appointed 9    by the Illinois Community College Board.10        (15) Four members representing students, 2 appointed 11    by the Board of Higher Education and 2 appointed by the 12    Illinois Community College Board.13    (b) The Committee on Free Expression shall meet initially 14at the call of the Chairperson of the Board of Higher 15Education, shall select one member as chairperson at its 16initial meeting, and shall thereafter meet at the call of that 17chairperson. The Board of Higher Education shall provide 18administrative and other support to the Committee.19    (c) The Committee on Free Expression shall report to the 20public, the Board of Higher Education, the Governor, and the 21General Assembly on September 1 of every year. The report 22shall include all of the following:23        (1) A description of any barriers to or disruptions of 24    free expression within public institutions.25        (2) A description of the administrative handling and 26    discipline relating to these disruptions or barriers.  SB1865- 8 -LRB104 08881 LNS 18936 b1        (3) A description of substantial difficulties, 2    controversies, or successes in maintaining a posture of 3    administrative and institutional neutrality with regard to 4    political or social issues.5        (4) Any assessments, criticisms, commendations, or 6    recommendations the committee sees fit to include. 7    Section 25. Freshman orientation information. Public 8institutions shall include in their freshman orientation 9programs a section describing to all students the policies and 10rules regarding free expression that are consistent with this 11Act. 12    Section 30. Rules; construction of Act. The Board of 13Higher Education is authorized to adopt rules to further the 14purposes of the policies adopted pursuant to this Act. Nothing 15in this Act shall be construed to prevent public institutions 16from regulating student speech or activity that is prohibited 17by other federal, State, or local laws. 18    Section 35. Enforcement. The following persons may bring 19an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin any 20violation of this Act or to recover reasonable court costs and 21attorney's fees:22        (1) The Attorney General.23        (2) A person whose expressive rights are violated by a   SB1865- 9 -LRB104 08881 LNS 18936 b1    violation of this Act.2    In an action brought under this Act, if the court finds 3that a violation of this Act occurred, the court may award the 4aggrieved person injunctive relief for the violation and shall 5award reasonable court costs and attorney's fees.